Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-259
Student suspension, expulsion, or exclusion; not a violation of compulsory attendance; compliance with other laws required.

If a student is suspended, expelled, or excluded from school or from any educational function pursuant to the Student Discipline Act, such absence from school shall not be deemed a violation on the part of any person under any compulsory school attendance statutes. Any suspension or expulsion under the act shall comply with the requirements of the Special Education Act and the requirements of the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act, 20 U.S.C. 1401 et seq.

Laws 1976, LB 503, § 4;

Laws 1994, LB 1250, § 10;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-4,173;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 63.

Compulsory attendance, see sections 79-201 to 79-210.

Special Education Act, see section 79-1110.